Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 36 Condominium Ownership
34-36-37.
Rights of tenants upon conversion to condominium ownership.

Whenever there is a conversion of residential real estate from rental status to condominium ownership the following provisions shall apply to the owner, developer, and tenants of the property:

All tenants shall be given at least one hundred twenty (120) days notice of the conversion. Rents shall not be increased during the notice period.

Tenants shall have the right to cancel their lease and receive no penalties for the cancellation as long as all obligations of the lease have been met.

The owner or developer shall honor all leases.

All tenants shall be extended the first opportunity to purchase their units.

An owner or developer shall not offer units for sale to the general public at terms more favorable than offered to the tenants, for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days subsequent to the tenant’s failure to exercise his or her right to purchase.

Tenants shall have sixty (60) days to inform the owner or developer of their intentions, and during this period the owner or developer shall not sell the units to the general public.

Any tenant who has attained the age of sixty-two (62) shall be given one-year notice. Rents shall not be increased during the notice period.

The owner or developer shall pay reasonable moving expenses and costs, to any tenant who has attained the age of sixty-two (62), within a fifty (50) mile radius.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 242, § 1.

34-36-38.
Applicability of local ordinance, regulation, and building codes.

A zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use ordinance, regulation, or any other municipal ordinance, rule or regulation may not prohibit the condominium form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium which would not be imposed upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership or otherwise regulate the creation, governance or existence of the condominium form of ownership, provided, however, that no provision of this section shall invalidate or modify any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 242, § 1.

34-36-39.
Chapter continuity.

This chapter shall not apply to new declarations of condominiums filed after July 1, 1982; nor shall this chapter apply to condominiums declared before July 1, 1982 where construction has not been commenced, but said condominiums shall be governed by chapter 36.1 of this title. Provided however certain activities of condominiums created under this chapter may be subject to chapter 36.1 of this title as defined in §

34-36.1-1.02

. Public offering statements and sales contracts shall clearly disclose that such offering or sale is not covered by the Rhode Island Condominium Act, chapter 36.1 of this title; pursuant thereto any public offering statement and any sales contract shall contain the following language in bold-faced type: “This condominium is not covered by the Rhode Island Condominium Act of 1982.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 1.